Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201176-2402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 76-2401 to 76-2430, the definitions found in
sections 76-2403 to 76-2415 shall be used.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 1.